Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.035

Business licensing service to compile and distribute information—Scope.

(1) The business licensing service must compile information regarding the regulatory programs associated with each of the licenses obtainable under the business licensing system. This information must include, at a minimum, a listing of the statutes and administrative rules requiring the licenses and pertaining to the regulatory programs that are directly related to the licensure. For example, for pesticide dealers' licenses, the information must include the statutes and rules requiring licensing as well as those pertaining to the subject of registering or distributing pesticides.

(2) The business licensing service must provide information governed by this section to any person requesting it. Materials used by the business licensing service to describe its services must indicate that this information is available upon request.

[ 2013 c 144 s 18; 1982 c 182 s 4.]